District of Columbia statutes.
41-140

Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are severable.

Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-160, § 140, 27 DCR 5150
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 39 of the Uniform Unclaimed Property Act (1981 Act).
1981 Ed., § 42-240.